Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 57.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
77-5031
Tax Equalization
and Review Commission Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Tax Equalization and Review Commission Cash Fund is hereby
created. All money received by the commission for appeals and services performed
and billed to other agencies or persons shall be credited to the fund. The
commission shall only bill for the actual amount expended in performing services.
The fund shall be used to carry out the provisions of the Tax Equalization
and Review Commission Act,
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Expenditures from the Tax Equalization and Review Commission Cash Fund shall
be made only when such funds are available. Any unexpended balance in the
fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not lapse to the General Fund. Any
money in the Tax Equalization and Review Commission Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 101;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 57.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.